Texas, session 892, HB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.131(a)(2), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (2)  "Residence homestead" has the meaning assigned by Section 11.13, except that for purposes of this section the term also includes: (A)  personal property owned by an individual that: (i)  is located at the address of the property for which the individual is claiming an exemption under this section; and (ii)  forms the basis for the individual's use of the property as the individual's primary residence; and (B)  all structures and improvements located at the address of the property for which an individual is claiming an exemption under this section if the structures, improvements, and property: (i)  have identical ownership; and (ii)  are used primarily for residential purposes. SECTION 2.  This Act applies only to ad valorem taxes imposed for a tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.